Utah statutes.
41-6a-401.5.   Accident involving death -- Stop at accident -- Penalty.
(1)  The operator of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in the death
of a person shall:
(a)  immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident or as close to
it as possible without obstructing traffic more than is necessary; and
(b)  remain at the scene of the accident until the operator has fulfilled the
requirements of Section 41-6a-401.7.
(2) A person who violates the provisions of Subsection (1) is guilty of a
third degree felony and shall be fined not less than $750.
